California statutes. Vehicle Code
 immediately suspend or revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle of a person who, with respect to an ignition interlock device installed pursuant to this section attempts to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, has the device removed prior to the termination date of the restriction, or fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the device. The privilege shall remain suspended or revoked for the remaining period of the originating suspension or revocation and until all reinstatement requirements in this section are satisfied, provided, however, that if the person provides proof to the satisfaction of the department that the person is in compliance with the restriction issued pursuant to this section, the department may, in its discretion, restore the privilege to operate a motor vehicle and reimpose the remaining term of the restriction.

(f) Notwithstanding the suspension periods
 specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) or Section 13352.1, if the person maintains a functioning, certified ignition interlock device for the mandatory term required under Section 23575.3, inclusive of any term credit earned under Section 13353.6 or 13353.75, the department shall reinstate the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle at the time the other reinstatement requirements are satisfied.

(g) For the purposes of this section, completion of a program is the following:

(1) Satisfactory completion of all program requirements approved pursuant to program licensure, as evidenced by a certificate of completion issued, under penalty of perjury, by the licensed program.

(2) Certification, under penalty of perjury, by the director of a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal
 Code, that the person has completed a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code.

(h) (1) The holder of a commercial driver’s license who was operating a motor vehicle other than a commercial vehicle, or a driver who was operating a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of the violation that resulted in the suspension of that person’s driving privilege pursuant to this section is not eligible for the restricted driver’s license authorized under paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as authorized under this section, the department shall issue the person a noncommercial driver’s license restricted in the same manner and subject to the same conditions and requirements as specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(i) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to this section shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate the device and monitor the operation of the device. The installer shall notify the department if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device.

(j) The reinstatement of the driving privilege pursuant to this section does not abrogate a person’s continuing duty to comply with any restriction imposed pursuant to Section 23575.3.

(k) For purposes of this section, “bypass” means either of the following:

(1) Failure to take any random retest.

(2) Failure to pass a random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent, by weight of alcohol, in the person’s blood.

(l) For purposes of this section, “random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals after the initial engine startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(m) The restriction conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall apply only to a person who is convicted for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 that occurred on or after January 1, 2019.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(o) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1,
 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 16, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.

(a) The department shall immediately suspend or revoke the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle upon the receipt of an abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 23109, or Section 23109.1, or upon the receipt of a report of a judge of the juvenile court, a juvenile traffic hearing officer, or a referee of a juvenile court showing that the person has been found to have committed a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 23109, or Section 23109.1. If an offense specified in this section occurs in a vehicle defined in Section 15210, the suspension or revocation specified in this subdivision also applies to the noncommercial driving privilege. The commercial driving privilege shall be disqualified
 as specified in Sections 15300 to 15302, inclusive. For the purposes of this section, suspension or revocation shall be as follows:

(1) Except as required under Section 13352.1 or 13352.4, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23536, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of six months. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code. If the court, as authorized under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 23646, elects to order a person to enroll in, participate in, and complete either program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542, the department shall require that program in lieu of the program
 described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(2) Upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23554, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of one year. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23556 of this code. If the court, as authorized under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 23646, elects to order a person to enroll in, participate in, and
 complete either program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542, the department shall require that program in lieu of the program described in Section 23556. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment, participation, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(3) Except as provided in Section 13352.5, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23540, the privilege shall be suspended for two years. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542 of this code. For
 the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall be subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restriction of the driving privilege if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period, or completion of 90 days of the suspension period if the underlying conviction did not include the use of drugs as defined in Section 312 and the person was found to be only under the influence of an alcoholic beverage at the time of the violation.

(B) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(i) Proof of enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(ii) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(C) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in subparagraph (B).

(D) The person submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(E) The person agrees to maintain the ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (g) of Section 23575.

(F) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(G) The person pays all reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(H) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the costs of administration of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(I) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (f) of Section 23575.

(4) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23560, the
 privilege shall be revoked for a period of three years. The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, and the person gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 23562 of this code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that after the completion of 12 months of the revocation period, which may include credit for a suspension period served under subdivision (c) of Section 13353.3, they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(i) The initial 12 months of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(ii) The initial 12 months of a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(B) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The person submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(D) The person agrees to maintain the ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (g) of Section 23575.

(E) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(F) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(G) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (f) of Section 23575.

(5) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation
 of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23546, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of three years. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person files proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 23548 of this code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed
 prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license, which may include credit for a suspension period served under subdivision (c) of Section 13353.3, if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period, or completion of six months of the suspension period if the underlying conviction did not include the use of drugs as defined in Section 312 and the person was found to be only under the influence of an alcoholic beverage at the time of the violation.

(B) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(i) Proof of enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program
 licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(ii) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(C) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in subparagraph (B).

(D) The person submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(E) The person agrees to maintain the ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (g) of Section 23575.

(F) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(G) An individual convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23546 may also, at any time after sentencing, petition the court for referral to an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. Unless good cause is shown, the court shall order the referral.

(H) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(I) The person pays to the
 department a fee sufficient to cover the costs of administration of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(J) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (f) of Section 23575.

(6) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23550.5 or 23566, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of five years. The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23568 of this code, or if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed
 pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall be subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that after completion of 12 months of the revocation period, which may include credit for a suspension period served under subdivision (c) of Section 13353.3, they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(i) Completion of the initial 12 months of a
 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(ii) Completion of the initial 12 months of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(B) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The person submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(D) The person agrees to maintain the ignition interlock device as
 required under subdivision (g) of Section 23575.

(E) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(F) An individual convicted of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23566 may also, at any time after sentencing, petition the court for referral to an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. Unless good cause is shown, the court shall order the referral.

(G) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(H) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (f) of Section 23575.

(7) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23550 or 23550.5, or of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23550.5, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of four years. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person files proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section
 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that after completion of 12 months of the revocation period, which may include credit for a suspension period served under subdivision (c) of Section 13353.3, they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(i) The initial 12 months of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence
 program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(ii) The initial 12 months of a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(B) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The person submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(D) The person agrees to maintain the ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (g) of Section 23575.

(E) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(F) An individual convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23550 may also, at any time after sentencing, petition the court for referral to an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. Unless good cause is shown, the court shall order the referral.

(G) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(H) The restriction shall remain
 in effect for the period required in subdivision (f) of Section 23575.

(8) (A) Upon a conviction or finding of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23109 that is punishable under subdivision (e) of that section or Section 23109.1, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of 90 days to six months, if ordered by the court. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2029, upon a finding of a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 23109 for engaging in a motor vehicle exhibition of speed, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 23109, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of 90 days to six months, if ordered by the court. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as
 defined in Section 16430.

(9) Upon a conviction or finding of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23109 that is punishable under subdivision (f) of that section, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of six months, if ordered by the court. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(b) For the purpose of paragraphs (2) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the finding of the juvenile court judge, the juvenile hearing officer, or the referee of a juvenile court of a commission of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 23109, or Section 23109.1, as specified in subdivision (a) of this section, is a conviction.

(c) A judge of a juvenile court, juvenile hearing officer, or referee of a juvenile
 court shall immediately report the findings specified in subdivision (a) to the department.

(d) A conviction of an offense in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or Canada that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23152, is a conviction of Section 23152 for the purposes of this section, and a conviction of an offense that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23153, is a conviction of Section 23153 for the purposes of this section. The department shall suspend or revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to this section upon receiving notice of that conviction.

(e) For the purposes of the restriction conditions specified in paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the department shall terminate the restriction imposed pursuant to
 this section and shall suspend or revoke the person’s driving privilege upon receipt of notification from the driving-under-the-influence program that the person has failed to comply with the program requirements. The person’s driving privilege shall remain suspended or revoked for the remaining period of the original suspension or revocation imposed under this section and until all reinstatement requirements described in this section are met.

(f) For the purposes of this section, completion of a program is the following:

(1) Satisfactory completion of all program requirements approved pursuant to program licensure, as evidenced by a certificate of completion issued, under penalty of perjury, by the licensed program.

(2) Certification, under penalty of perjury, by the director of a program specified in Section 8001
 of the Penal Code, that the person has completed a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code.

(g) The holder of a commercial driver’s license who was operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of a violation that resulted in a suspension or revocation of the person’s noncommercial driving privilege under this section is not eligible for the restricted driver’s license authorized under paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(h) This section shall become operative January 1,
 2033.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 16, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 2.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.1.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13352 and except as required under subdivision (c) of this section or Section 13352.4, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23536, if the court refers the person to a program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23538, the privilege shall be suspended for 10 months.

(b) The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code. For the purposes of this subdivision, enrollment,
 participation, and completion of an approved program shall be subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit may not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(c) (1) Except when the court has ordered installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 23575.3, the department shall advise the person that the person may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The underlying conviction was not only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(B) The person satisfactorily provides to the department, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, enrollment in, or completion of, a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code.

(C) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in subparagraph (B).

(D) The person does both of the following:

(i) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(ii) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified
 ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (e).

(E) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(F) The person pays all reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(G) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(2) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (d).

(d) (1) The restricted driving privilege shall become effective when the department receives all of the documents and fees required under subdivision (c) and, except as specified
 in paragraph (2) or (3), shall remain in effect until all reinstatement requirements are satisfied.

(2) For the purposes of the restriction conditions specified in subdivision (c), the department shall terminate the restriction imposed pursuant to this section and shall suspend or revoke the person’s driving privilege upon receipt of notification from the driving-under-the-influence program that the person has failed to comply with the program requirements. The person’s driving privilege shall remain suspended or revoked for the remaining period of the original suspension or revocation imposed under this section and until all reinstatement requirements described in this section are met.

(3) The department shall immediately suspend or revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle of a person who, with respect to an ignition interlock device installed pursuant to Section 23575.3,
 attempts to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, has the device removed prior to the termination date of the restriction, or fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the device. The privilege shall remain suspended or revoked for the remaining period of the originating suspension or revocation and until all reinstatement requirements in this section are satisfied, provided, however, that if the person provides proof to the satisfaction of the department that the person is in compliance with the restriction issued pursuant to this section, the department may, in its discretion, restore the privilege to operate a motor vehicle and reimpose the remaining term of the restriction.

(e) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the department pursuant to this section shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer
 at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate the device and monitor the operation of the device. The installer shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device.

(f) (1) The holder of a commercial driver’s license who was operating a motor vehicle other than a commercial vehicle, or a driver who was operating a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of the violation that resulted in the suspension of that person’s driving privilege under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or this section is not eligible for the restricted driver’s license authorized under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as authorized under this section, the department shall issue the person a noncommercial driver’s license restricted in the same manner and subject to the same conditions and requirements as specified in subdivision (c).

(g) For the purposes of this section, “bypass” means either of the following:

(1) Failure to take any random retest.

(2) Failure to pass a random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent, by weight of alcohol, in the person’s blood.

(h) For purposes of this section, “random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals after the initial engine
 startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(i) The restriction conditions specified in this section shall apply only to a person who is convicted for a violation of Section 23152, as specified in subdivision (a), that occurred on or after January 1, 2019.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 3.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.1.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13352 and except as required under Section 13352.4, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23536, if the court refers the person to a program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23538, the privilege shall be suspended for 10 months.

(b) The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code. For the purposes of this subdivision, enrollment, participation, and completion of an approved
 program shall be subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit may not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2033.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.2.

(a) If a person is required under Section 13352 to provide the department with proof of enrollment in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code, the department shall deem that requirement satisfied upon receiving at its headquarters proof of enrollment that is satisfactory to the department and has been forwarded to the department by the program provider.

(b) If a person is required under Section 13352 to provide the department with proof of completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code, the department shall deem that requirement satisfied upon receiving at its headquarters proof of completion that is satisfactory to the department and has been forwarded to the department by the program provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 13352 and Sections 13367 and 23521, the department immediately shall revoke the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court showing that the person was convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 while under 18 years of age, or upon receipt of a report of a judge of the juvenile court, a juvenile hearing officer, or a referee of a juvenile court showing that the person has been found to have committed a violation of Section 23152 or 23153.

(b) The term of the revocation shall be until the person reaches 18 years of age, for one year, or for the period prescribed for restriction, suspension, or revocation specified in subdivision (a) of Section 13352, whichever is longer. The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility as defined in Section 16430.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (h), or when the court has ordered installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 23575.3, the department shall issue a restricted driver’s license to a person whose driver’s license was suspended under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or Section 13352.1, if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Submits proof satisfactory to the department of either of the following:

(A) Enrollment in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code.

(B) Enrollment in a program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542, if the court has ordered the person to enroll in, participate in, and complete either program described in that section, in which case the person shall not be required to provide proof of the enrollment described in subparagraph (A).

(2) Submits proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(3) Pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(b) The restriction of the driving privilege shall become effective when the department receives all of the documents and fees required under subdivision (a) and shall remain in effect for a period of 12 months and until the date all reinstatement requirements described in
 Section 13352 or 13352.1 have been met.

(c) The restriction of the driving privilege shall be limited to the hours necessary for driving to and from the person’s place of employment, driving during the course of employment, and driving to and from activities required in the driving-under-the-influence program.
